Hawaii statutes.
§602-59 Review of decision of the
intermediate appellate court, certiorari. (a) After issuance of the
intermediate appellate court's judgment or dismissal order, a party may seek
review of the intermediate appellate court's decision and judgment or dismissal
order only by application to the supreme court for a writ of certiorari, the
acceptance or rejection of which shall be discretionary upon the supreme court.

(b) The application for writ of certiorari
shall tersely state its grounds, which shall include:

(1) Grave errors of law or of fact; or

(2) Obvious inconsistencies in the decision of the
intermediate appellate court with that of the supreme court, federal decisions,
or its own decision,

and the magnitude of those errors or inconsistencies
dictating the need for further appeal.

(c) An application for a writ of certiorari
may be filed with the supreme court no later than thirty days after the filing
of the judgment or dismissal order of the intermediate appellate court. Upon a
written request filed prior to the expiration of the thirty-day period, a
party may extend the time for filing an application for a writ of certiorari
for no more than an additional thirty days. Opposition to an application for a
writ of certiorari may be filed no later than fifteen days after the
application is filed. The supreme court shall determine to accept the
application within thirty days after an objection is or could have been filed.
The failure of the supreme court to accept within thirty days shall constitute
a rejection of the application.

(d) Upon the acceptance of the application,
the clerk shall forward the complete file of the case to the supreme court.
Supplemental briefs shall be accepted from the parties only upon the request of
the supreme court. [L 1979, c 111, pt of §3; am L 1997, c 24, §1; am L 2004, c
202, §59; am L 2006, c 94, §1 and c 149, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1; am L 2011, c
77, §1]

Note

Applicability of 2011 amendment. L 2011, c 77, §3.

Rules of Court

Writ of certiorari, see HRAP rule 40.1.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Development of Hawai‘i's Appellate Courts: An
Organizational Perspective. 33 UH L. Rev. 875 (2011).

Case Notes

Where appellate court's amended order denying reconsideration
corrected only clerical errors and did not materially alter rights or
obligations, entry of amended order did not extend time within which petitioner
was required to file application for certiorari under subsection (c) and HRAP
rule 40.1(a); petitioner's application for certiorari was thus untimely. 94 H.
297, 12 P.3d 1238 (2000).

Where summary disposition order of the intermediate court of
appeals contained no grave errors of law or fact and was not obviously
inconsistent with the appellate case law of this State, defendant's application
for writ of certiorari dismissed as improvidently granted. 101 H. 127, 63 P.3d
1097 (2002).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next